Arkansas, session 2025, SB553.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-59-115 is amended to read as follows:
14-59-115. Duties of municipal treasurer.
(a)(1) A municipal treasurer, whether elected or appointed, shall
complete eight (8) hours of training provided by the Arkansas Municipal
League in cooperation with Arkansas Legislative Audit.
(2)(A) A newly elected or appointed municipal treasurer shall
complete the training required under this subsection within one hundred
eighty (180) days of taking office.
(B) If the municipal treasurer fails to obtain the
required training under this subsection within one hundred eighty (180) days
of taking office, the municipality is in noncompliance with this chapter
*SSS275*
03/20/2025 3:32:37 PM SSS275

SB553
until the municipal treasurer completes the training.
(b)(1) The curriculum for the mandatory training under subsection (a)
of this section shall be established by the Arkansas Municipal League in
cooperation with Arkansas Legislative Audit.
(2) The curriculum for the mandatory training under subsection
(a) of this section shall provide at least eight (8) hours of training.
(c) Each municipal treasurer of this state or the designated
representative that has been approved by the governing body shall submit a
monthly financial report to the council or board of directors.
(b) (d)(1) Municipal treasurers shall maintain the accounting records
prescribed in this chapter and other duties that may be prescribed by
ordinance.
(2)(A)(i) If the municipal treasurer does not comply with this
chapter or requests that specific duties be assigned to another employee or
contracting entity, the governing body of a municipality may assign specific
duties outlined in this chapter to another employee, or it may contract for
the services to be performed by a private, qualified person or entity.
(ii) As used in this subdivision (d)(2)(A),
"private, qualified person" means a person who, at minimum, is a resident of
Arkansas and has:
(a) Previous experience in government or
municipal accounting in Arkansas; or
(b) Received the training under
subsection (a) of this section.
(iii) Any other employee or private person
contracted with by the municipality to take on specific duties outlined in
this chapter shall obtain the training required under subsection (a) of this
section within one hundred eighty (180) days of taking on the duties
assigned.
(iv)(a)(1) Before the governing body of a
municipality assigns or contracts with a private, qualified person or entity
for the disbursing of funds, the governing body of a municipality shall
establish by ordinance a method that provides for internal accounting
controls and documentation for audit and accounting purposes.
(2) The municipal treasurer shall
approve the disbursement of funds before the private, qualified person or
03/20/2025 3:32:37 PM SSS275

SB553
entity disburses the funds.
(b) The governing body of a municipality shall
ensure that the private, qualified person or entity is adequately insured and
bonded and conforms to best practices and standards in the industry.
(B)(i) The governing body of a municipality may not assign
duties relating to the collecting of funds to anyone other than an employee
of the municipality.
(ii) The governing body of a municipality may assign
or contract with a private, qualified person or entity for the duties
relating to the disbursing of funds for payroll, bonded debt, or construction
projects funded with bond proceeds.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-59-117(b), concerning withholdings of
turnback funds for noncompliance for municipal accounting, is amended to read
as follows:
(b)(1) Upon notification of noncompliance by Arkansas Legislative
Audit, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall notify in writing the
mayor and the city council or town council that the municipality's accounting
records do not substantially comply with this chapter.
(2)(A) Upon notification by the Legislative Joint Auditing
Committee of noncompliance by the municipal treasurer under § 14-59-115(a),
the governing body of the municipality shall require the treasurer to attend
the training as described under § 14-59-115(a).
(B) The minutes of the governing body of the municipality
shall reflect receipt of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee
notification under subdivision (b)(2) of this section and the subsequent
municipal treasurer training requirement.
(3) The municipality has sixty (60) days after the date of
notification to bring the accounting records into substantial compliance with
this chapter.
(3) (4)(A) After the sixty (60) days allowed for compliance or
upon request by the appropriate municipal officials, Arkansas Legislative
Audit shall review the records to determine if the municipality substantially
complies with this chapter.
(B) Arkansas Legislative Audit shall report its findings
to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.
03/20/2025 3:32:37 PM SSS275

SB553

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 14-59-117(c)(2), concerning withholdings of
turnback funds for noncompliance for municipal accounting, is amended to read
as follows:
(2) If the municipality has not achieved substantial compliance
within the sixty-day period, the governing body of the municipality shall
assign specific duties outlined in this chapter to another employee or shall
contract for the services to be performed by a private, qualified person or
entity as described under § 14-59-115.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. Effective Date.
This act is effective on and after July 1, 2026.
























03/20/2025 3:32:37 PM SSS275